Utah statutes.
63J-8-105.6.   Escalante Region Grazing Zone established -- Findings -- Management and land use priorities.

(1)  There is established the Escalante Region Grazing Zone in Garfield and Kane Counties for the purpose of:

(a)  recognizing and preserving the significant history, culture, custom, and values of the grazing industry within the designation; and

(b)  maximizing efficient and responsible preservation, enhancement, and development of grazing practices and affected natural, historical, and cultural activities within the designation.

(2)  The land area and boundaries of the Escalante Region Grazing Zone are described in Subsection 63J-8-102(5) and illustrated on the map described in Section 63J-8-105.

(3)  The state finds that:

(a)  grazing on the lands comprising the Escalante Region Grazing Zone has provided a significant contribution to the history, customs, culture, and values of the area for more than 100 years;

(b)  abundant natural and vegetative resources exist within the Escalante Region Grazing Zone to support and expand continued, responsible grazing activities;

(c)  grazing and its associated historic resources, its long and dignified human history, its shaping of human endeavors in the American West, its variety of cultural resources, affiliation, type and distribution, its landmarks, structures, and other objects of historic or scientific interest are worthy of and have been recognized for protection by local, state, and federal governments;

(d)  the highest management priorities for lands within the Escalante Region Grazing Zone are responsible management, enhancement, and development of existing and future grazing resources in order to provide protection for the resources, objects, customs, culture, and values identified above;

(e)  responsible development of abundant deposits of energy and mineral resources, including oil, natural gas, oil shale, oil sands, coal, phosphate, gold, uranium, and copper, as well as areas with high wind and solar energy potential, are compatible with grazing activities in the Escalante Region Grazing Zone; and

(f)  responsible development of abundant recreation resources, including wildlife, roads, campgrounds, water resources, trails, OHV use, sightseeing, canyoneering, hunting, fishing, and hiking are compatible with grazing activities in the Escalante Region Grazing Zone.

(4)  The state supports:

(a)  efficient and responsible full development, within the Escalante Region Grazing Zone, of:

(i)  all permitted existing and future grazing resources; and

(ii)  other uses compatible with grazing activities; and

(b)  a cooperative management approach by federal agencies, the state of Utah, and local governments to achieve broadly supported management plans for the full development, within the Escalante Region Grazing Zone, of:

(i)  all grazing resources; and

(ii)  other uses compatible with grazing activities.

(5)  The state requests that the federal agencies that administer lands within the Escalante Region Grazing Zone:

(a)  fully cooperate and coordinate with the state of Utah and with Garfield and Kane Counties to develop, amend, and implement land and resource management plans and implement management decisions that are consistent with the purposes, goals, and policies described in this section to the maximum extent allowed under federal law;

(b)  expedite the processing, granting, and streamlining of grazing permits, range improvements, and applications to enhance and otherwise develop all existing and permitted grazing resources located within the Escalante Region Grazing Zone, including renewable vegetative resources;

(c)  allow continued maintenance and increased development of roads, power lines, pipeline infrastructure, and other utilities necessary to achieve the goals, purposes, and policies described in this section and consistent with multiple use/sustained yield principles;

(d)  refrain from any planning decisions and management actions that will undermine, restrict, or diminish the goals, purposes, and policies for the Escalante Region Grazing Zone as stated in this section; and

(e)  refrain from implementing a policy that is contrary to the goals and purposes described within this section.

(6)  The state calls upon Congress to establish an intergovernmental standing commission, with membership consisting of representatives from the United States government, the state of Utah, and local governments to guide and control planning decisions and management actions in the Escalante Region Grazing Zone in order to achieve the goals, purposes, and policies described in this section.

(7)  Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the state's mineral, oil, gas, and energy policies and plans on land within the Escalante Region Grazing Zone shall continue to be governed by Sections 63J-4-401 and 63J-8-104.



Enacted by Chapter 393, 2013 General Session

